North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-21 Drainage Assessment Projects

61-21-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the subject matter otherwise requires:

“Affected landowners” means landowners whose land is subject to assessment or condemnation.

“Board” means the board of managers of a water resource district.

“Cleaning out and repairing of drain” means deepening and widening of drains as well as removing obstructions or sediment, and any repair necessary to return the drain to a satisfactory and useful condition.

“Drain” means any natural watercourse opened, or proposed to be opened, and improved for drainage and any artificial drains of any nature or description constructed for that purpose, including dikes and appurtenant works. This definition may include more than one watercourse or artificial channel constructed for the aforementioned purpose when the watercourses or channels drain land within a practical drainage area as determined by the written petition called for in section 61-21-10 and the survey and examination called for in section 61-21-12.

“Lateral drain” means a drain constructed after the establishment of the original drain or drainage system and which flows into such original drain or drainage system from outside the limits of the original drain; provided, that a determination by the board as to whether an existing or proposed drain is a lateral or a new drain within the meaning of this subsection shall be conclusive when entered upon the records of such board.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2101; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 12; 1965, ch. 448, § 2; 1977, ch. 571, § 3; 1981, ch. 632, § 8; 2015, ch. 473, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Definitions relating to water resource districts, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-02.

Water resource district board of managers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-16-07 to 61-16-09, 61-16.1-09, 61-16.1-10.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

Collateral References.

Municipal liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in carrying out construction or repair of sewers and drains, 61 A.L.R.2d 874.

61-21-02.
Watercourses, ditches, and drains may be constructed, maintained, repaired, improved, or extended.

Watercourses, ditches, drains, and improvements thereto for the drainage of sloughs and other lowlands may be surveyed and investigated and established, constructed, maintained, repaired, improved, and cleaned out in the several counties of this state under the provisions of this chapter wherever the same shall be conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare. The powers conferred by this chapter and this section shall extend to and include:

The deepening and widening or any necessary improvement of drains which have been or hereafter may be constructed.

The straightening, clearing, or cleaning out and deepening of channels of creeks, streams, and rivers, and the construction, maintenance, remodeling, repairing, and extension of levees, dikes, and barriers for the purpose of drainage.

The location or extension of any drain if such location or extension is necessary to provide a suitable outlet or reasonably drain lands within a practical drainage area of such drains.

The establishment, in whole or in part, of a drain and the completion of the same on the line of an abandoned or invalid drain.

The establishment and construction of lateral drains with outlets in drains already constructed.

The installation of artificial subsurface drainage systems.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2102; 2011, ch. 498, § 1; 2011, ch. 499, § 1.

61-21-02.1.
Assessment drain culverts.

As part of the design and construction of a proposed assessment drain or the maintenance or reconstruction of an existing assessment drain, the board, upon approval of the appropriate road authority, may locate, relocate, size, and install culverts through roads which are not on the routes of assessment drains but which are within the assessment area and which are necessary for surface water to reach the assessment drain. The design and installation of culverts under this section must be consistent with chapters 24-03 and 24-06 and the streamcrossing and construction site protection standards prepared by the department of transportation and the department of water resources.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 558, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 166, effective August 1, 2021.

61-21-03.
Board of drainage commissioners — Appointment — Term — Removal — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-04.
State and county officers not eligible as drain commissioners — Matters of personal interest to drain commissioners. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-05.
Powers of board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-06.
Board’s report to board of county commissioners — Contents — Inspection — Liability of drain commissioner on bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-07.
Oath and bond filed by drain commissioners — Organization of board — Quorum. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-08.
Office, records, clerk, and employment of personnel. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-09.
Levy for administrative expense — Payment of commissioners’ salaries and overhead expense. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 12.

61-21-10.
Petition for construction of drain — Purposes of drain — Signers to petition.

A written petition for the construction of a drain may be made to the board. Such petition shall designate the starting point, terminus, and general course of the proposed drain. If among the leading purposes of the proposed drain are benefits to the health, convenience, or welfare of the people of any city, the petition shall be signed by a sufficient number of the property owners of such city to satisfy the board that there is a public demand for such drain. The petition shall be signed by at least six property owners or a majority of the landowners within the proposed district whose property will be drained by the proposed drain.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2110.

61-21-11.
Bond required from petitioners.

The board may require the petitioners referred to in section 61-21-10 to file a bond with the petition in a sum sufficient to pay all expenses of surveys and of the board should the petition be later denied. However, in no event shall the petitioners be required to pay expenses of surveys and of the water resource board, and any other expenses that may be incurred, if the petition is later approved, but the drain is not constructed.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2111; S.L. 1979, ch. 646, § 1; 1981, ch. 632, § 9.

61-21-12.
Examination of line for drain — Designation of surveyor — Specifications — Cost estimates.

Upon presentation of a petition as provided in section 61-21-10, the board shall examine the line of the proposed drain, and if in its opinion further proceedings are warranted, it shall adopt a resolution to that effect and designate a competent surveyor or engineer to assist the board. For the purpose of making examinations or surveys, the board or its employees may enter upon any land traversed by any proposed drain or any other lands necessary to gain access thereto. The surveyor or engineer shall prepare profiles, plans, and specifications of the proposed drain, estimates of the total cost thereof, and a map or plan of the lands to be drained showing the regular subdivisions thereof, which map or plan shall be filed in the office of the county auditor for inspection by the public. In determining the best location for the proposed drain, the board may in its discretion set the location on lines differing from the lines described in the petition. When the length of line described in the petition does not give sufficient fall to drain the land sought to be drained, the board may extend the drain below the outlet named in the petition. The estimate of costs prepared by the surveyor or engineer shall be in sufficient detail to allow the board to determine the probable share of the total costs that will be assessed against each of the affected landowners in the proposed drainage district.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2112.

61-21-13.
Hearing on petition to establish drain and surveyor’s report — Notice — Contents.

Upon the filing of the surveyor’s or engineer’s report provided for in section 61-21-12, the board shall fix a date and place for public hearing on the petition. Such place of hearing shall be in the vicinity of the proposed drain and shall be convenient and accessible for the majority of the landowners subject to assessment for such drain or whose property shall be subject to condemnation for the proposed drain. At least ten days before such hearing, the board shall file with the county auditor a list showing the percentage assessment against each parcel of land benefited by the proposed drain and the approximate assessment in terms of money apportioned thereto. Notice of such filing shall be included in the notice of hearing on the petition. At least ten days’ notice of such hearing shall be given by publishing a notice at least once in the official newspaper of the county in which the proposed drain is located. In addition, each owner of land subject to assessment for the proposed drain and each landowner whose property shall be subject to condemnation for the proposed drain as shown by the record in the office of the recorder shall be mailed a notice of such hearing at the owner’s post-office address as shown by such records. Notices of such hearing shall contain a copy of the petition and the time and place where the board will act upon the petition. The notice of hearing shall specify the point or place of beginning of the proposed drain and where it terminates, and shall describe the general course of the drain as finally determined by the engineer and the board. The notice of hearing shall also specify when and where votes for and against such proposed drain shall be filed. The final date when votes must be filed shall not be less than ten days after the date of the hearing on the petition. A form of ballot shall be mailed with the notice of hearing for use by the affected landowners in voting for or against the proposed drain. An affidavit of mailing signed by the attorney or clerk of the board or other person mailing such notices shall be filed with the county auditor who shall file such affidavit with the records of the proceedings pertaining to that drain. All persons whose land may be subject to assessment for such drain or whose property shall be subject to condemnation for such drain may appear before the board, fully express their opinions, and offer evidence upon the matters pertaining thereto.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2113; S.L. 1961, ch. 382, § 1; 1965, ch. 448, § 3; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Official newspaper of county, see N.D.C.C. ch. 46-06.

61-21-14.
Conduct of hearing on petition to establish drain.

Prior to the hearing provided for in section 61-21-13, the board shall first prepare a roster or roll of affected landowners subject to assessment for such drain or whose property shall be subject to condemnation for such drain, and shall limit voting rights to such landowners. A record shall be made by the board of affected landowners present in person or by agent and such records shall be preserved in the minutes of the meeting. Affected landowners shall then be informed of the probable total cost of the project and their individual share of such cost and the amount of their property to be condemned for such project. The board shall fix a time, which shall not be less than ten days after the hearing on the petition, within which the votes for and against the establishment of the proposed drain shall be filed with the board. Objections to or approvals of the drain in writing may be filed with the board and shall be considered as votes for or against the proposed drain, as the case may be. A telegram shall be deemed writing, and any form of written approval or objection which sufficiently indicates the intention of the writer shall be sufficient. Once the deadline for filing votes for or against the proposed drain has been reached, no more votes for or against such drain shall be filed and no person shall withdraw that person’s name from the list of those voting for or against the proposed drain after the deadline for filing votes has been reached. Any withdrawals of objections to or approvals of the proposed drain before that time shall be in writing only. When the votes of affected landowners have been filed and the deadline for filing votes for and against such drain has been reached, the board shall immediately proceed to determine whether or not more than fifty percent of the votes filed, as determined by section 61-21-16, are in favor of the construction of the drain. Until such determination is made, the board is without jurisdiction to take any further steps in the matter except to determine whether more than fifty percent of the votes filed are in favor of the drain and to adopt a resolution for discontinuance, if not more than fifty percent of the votes filed favor construction of the drain.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2114; S.L. 1961, ch. 382, § 2; 1965, ch. 448, § 4.

61-21-15.
Denying or making order establishing drain — Costs when petition denied.

If, upon the examination by the board before the survey has been made, or, if upon the hearing upon the petition or upon the trial in the district court, it shall appear that there was not sufficient cause for making such petition, or that the proposed drain would cost more than the amount of the benefits to be derived therefrom or that fifty percent or more of the votes of affected landowners as determined by section 61-21-16, which were filed with the board, are opposed to such drain, the board shall deny the petition. An objection in writing filed with the board shall, as provided in section 61-21-13, be considered the same as a vote by ballot. The board may bring an action against the petitioners or upon their bond for all costs and expenses incurred in the proceedings, in which case the petitioners shall be jointly and severally liable, or the board may pay the costs and expenses out of any moneys available. If it shall appear, after due hearing as provided in sections 61-21-13 and 61-21-14, that the proposed drain will not cost more than the amount of the benefits to be derived therefrom and is approved by more than fifty percent of the votes of the affected landowners filed with the board as determined by section 61-21-16, the board shall make an order establishing the drain, accurately describing it, and giving the same a name under which it shall be recorded and indexed.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2115; S.L. 1961, ch. 382, § 3; 1979, ch. 646, § 2.

61-21-16.
Voting right or power of landowners.

In order that there may be a fair relation between the amount of liability for assessments and the power of objecting to the establishment of a proposed drain, the voice or vote of affected landowners on the question of establishing the drain shall be arrived at in the following manner:

The landowner or landowners of tracts of land affected by the drain shall have one vote for each dollar of assessment that the owner’s land is subject to or one vote for each dollar of the assessed valuation of land condemned for the drain, as estimated by the board under the provisions of section 61-21-12. It is the intent of this section to allow one vote for each dollar of assessment, regardless of the number of owners of such tract of land. Where more than one owner of such land exists, the votes shall be prorated among them in accordance with each owner’s interest.

A written power of attorney shall authorize an agent to cast the votes of any affected landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2116; S.L. 1961, ch. 383, § 1; 1965, ch. 448, § 5.

Cross-References.

Water resource district projects, voting rights of affected landowners, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-20.

61-21-17.
Notice of order establishing drain and period for appeal.

Upon the making of an order establishing or denying establishment of a drain, the board shall give notice to all affected landowners by publishing a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The notice must include a copy of the order and must advise the affected landowners of their right to appeal under section 61-21-18.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2117; S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 30.

Cross-References.

Appeals from water resource district boards, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-16.1-54 to 61-16.1-58.

61-21-18.
Appeal to district court — Time — Undertaking — Hearing.

Any person whose land is assessed or may be assessed or is condemned or may be condemned for the construction of a drain under the provisions of this chapter may appeal to the district court from the order of the board establishing or denying the establishment of the drain. The appeal must be taken in accordance with the procedure provided in section 28-34-01. The appellant must give an undertaking to be approved by the clerk of district court in the sum of two hundred fifty dollars for the payment of the costs in the event that the appellant is unsuccessful in the district court. The undertaking must run in favor of the county in which the drain is located, and, if located in more than one county, it may run in the name of either of the counties in which the drain is located. The judge shall hear the appeal not less than ten days nor more than thirty days after the filing of the appeal with the clerk, the day of hearing to be fixed by the court, but such time for hearing may be extended by the court for good cause for a period not to exceed thirty days. The case must be tried in all respects as a court case without a jury. Where the appeal is perfected, the district court upon the hearing may try and determine the question as to whether, in the first instance, there was sufficient cause for making the petition for the establishment of the drain, whether the proposed drain will cost more than the amount of the benefits to be derived therefrom, and whether such drain was objected to by a majority of the affected landowners in accordance with the weighted voting provisions of section 61-21-16.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2118; S.L. 1965, ch. 448, § 6; 1989, ch. 83, § 31.

61-21-19.
Right of way — How acquired — Assessment of damages — Issuance of warrants.

Subject to chapter 32-15, the right of way for the construction, operation, and maintenance of a proposed drain, if not conveyed to the county by the owner, may be acquired by eminent domain. If lands assessed for drainage benefits are not contiguous to the drain, access right of way thereto over the land of others may be acquired in the same manner. The right of way, when acquired, is the property of the county. The board may issue warrants in a sum sufficient to pay the damages assessed for the right of way. The warrants must be drawn upon the proper county treasurer or, if the water resource district treasurer is custodian of the drain funds, water resource district treasurer, and are payable out of drain funds in the hands of the treasurer that have been collected for the construction of the drain for which the right of way is sought to be obtained. The board shall negotiate the warrants at not less than the par value thereof and shall pay into court for the benefit of the owners of the right of way the amount to which each is entitled according to the assessment of damages, paying the surplus, if any, to the county treasurer or water resource district treasurer, who shall place the same to the credit of the proper drain fund.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2119; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 14; 2001, ch. 567, § 1; 2007, ch. 293, § 42.

Cross-References.

Eminent domain, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-15.

61-21-20.
Assessing cost of constructing and maintaining drain.

After the making of the order establishing the drain, the board shall assess the percentage of the cost of acquiring right of way and constructing and maintaining such drain in accordance with benefits received, against:

Any county, township, or city which is benefited thereby; and

Any lot, piece, parcel, or interest in land which is either directly or indirectly benefited by such drain or by such drain in connection with other existing or proposed drains.

No land already included in and being assessed by an existing drainage district shall be included and assessed in any newly formed drainage district unless it can be shown that such land will be benefited by the construction of the new drain. The board in considering the benefit and assessing the percentage of costs to each affected tract, parcel, or piece of land may, among other things, take into consideration the present drainage facilities under any existing drainage district, potential use of the proposed drain by such land, whether any such lands will be benefited or harmed by any change in the existing flow and course of drainage water by reason of the construction of the drain, and such other matters as may be pertinent to the question of benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 20; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2120.

Cross-References.

Assessments for water resource district projects, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-16.1-21 to 61-16.1-33.

61-21-21.
Assessment subject to review — Notice of time and place.

The percentage assessments provided for in section 61-21-20 shall be subject to review, and ten days’ notice of the time and place where such percentage assessments will be reviewed by the board shall be given by publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the county. In addition, each owner of land affected by the proposed drain as shown by the record in the office of the recorder or county treasurer shall be mailed a notice of such hearing at the owner’s post-office address as shown by such records, and an affidavit of mailing shall be filed with the proceedings of such drain.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2121; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

61-21-22.
Hearing on assessment — Appeal — Correction of assessments — Relocating drain — Fees.

At the hearing provided for in section 61-21-21, the board shall proceed to hear all complaints relative to the percentage assessments and shall correct or confirm the same. Should landowners subject to assessment or whose property is subject to condemnation for the construction of the proposed drain having a majority of the possible votes, as determined by section 61-21-16, believe that the assessment had not been fairly or equitably made, or that the drain is not properly located or designed, they may appeal to the department of water resources by petition within ten days after the hearing on assessments, to review the percentage assessments and to examine the location and design of the proposed drain. Upon the receipt of the petition, the department shall examine the lands assessed and the location and design of the proposed drain, and should the department determine the assessments have not been made equitably, the department may correct the assessments, and the department’s correction and adjustment of assessments are final. Should the department determine the drain has been improperly located or designed, the department may order a relocation and redesign. The relocation and redesign must be followed in the construction of the proposed drain. For the department’s services in reviewing the assessments and examining the location and design, the department is entitled to ten dollars per day and actual and necessary expenses during the time the department is engaged upon the work. All moneys received by the department must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund. After the hearing provided in this section, the board shall make a finding that the benefits to all tracts of land will exceed the costs that will be assessed against the lands. Any landowner who claims the landowner will receive no benefit from the construction of a new drain may appeal the question of whether there is any benefit to the department upon the filing of a bond in the sum of two hundred fifty dollars with the board for the payment of the costs of the department in the matter. The department may not determine the specific amount of benefits upon an appeal by an individual landowner, but shall determine only whether there is any benefit to the landowner, and the determination of the department is final.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2122; S.L. 1965, ch. 448, § 7; 2021, ch. 488, § 167, effective August 1, 2021.

61-21-23.
Recording assessment.

After the percentage assessment of benefits has been made, as provided in section 61-21-20 and confirmed upon hearing as provided in section 61-21-22, the board shall record such percentage assessments in the permanent records of the drain and such percentage assessment shall further be permanently recorded by the county auditor in a book of drainage assessments.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 23; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2123.

61-21-24.
Notice of letting of contracts.

After the recording of percentage assessments as provided in section 61-21-23, the board shall then give at least ten days’ notice of the time and place where contracts will be let for the construction of the drain. Such notice shall be published at least once in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 24; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2124; S.L. 1963, ch. 421, § 15.

Cross-References.

Contracts for construction and maintenance of water resource district projects, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-14.

61-21-25.
Letting of contracts for drains.

The board shall let contracts for the construction of the drain, culverts, bridges, and appurtenances thereto, or portions thereof, in accordance with chapter 48-01.2.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 25; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2125; S.L. 1977, ch. 571, § 4; 1995, ch. 443, § 26; 2007, ch. 403, § 22.

61-21-26.
Extension of time to contractors — Reletting unfinished part of contract.

The board may grant a reasonable extension of time for the completion of any contract. When any contract shall not be finished within the time specified, or to which it may be extended, the board in its discretion at any time thereafter may relet such unfinished portion or any part thereof to the lowest responsible bidder, and shall take security as before. The cost of completing such unfinished portions over and above the contract price, and the expense of notices and reletting shall be collected by the board from the parties first contracting. In no case shall the board forfeit and annul a contract without giving five days’ notice to the contractor, if the contractor can be found or has a known place of residence in the county. Such notice may be given to such contractor personally or may be left at the contractor’s place of residence.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 26; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2126.

61-21-27.
Apportionment and taxation of costs.

After the letting of contracts or a portion thereof, the board shall compute the cost of the drain, including estimated costs of any unfinished portions. The board shall determine the sum to be levied to pay such cost, which sum shall be prorated and assessed against lands in accordance with the percentage determined under section 61-21-20. A copy of the list of assessments shall be served on the clerk or auditor of each municipality against which taxes are to be assessed and shall also be filed in the office of the county auditor of the county or counties in which municipalities and lands benefited by the drain are situated. The provisions of section 61-21-52 shall apply to the levies and assessments provided for in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 27; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2127.

61-21-28.
Collection of drain taxes.

The county treasurer shall collect the drain taxes and shall credit all moneys so collected to the drain fund to which they belong. The county treasurer shall act as the custodian of the drain funds unless the board of the water resource district having jurisdiction over the drain requests otherwise in writing. Upon receiving a written request from the water resource district board, the county treasurer shall pay all moneys collected, and the earnings thereon, to the treasurer of the water resource district, who shall then act as the custodian of the drain funds. A direction by a board is effective for all moneys then in the custody of the county treasurer and all moneys subsequently collected thereafter unless and until the board directs in writing that the county treasurer act as the custodian of the moneys.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 28; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2128; S.L. 2001, ch. 567, § 2.

Cross-References.

Collection of special assessments for water resource district projects, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-29.

Lien and sale of property for special assessments levied under this title, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-01-20, 61-01-21.

61-21-29.
Payment of costs and expenses of locating, constructing, maintaining, and improving drain — Warrants issued.

Payment of all expenses and costs of locating and constructing a drain must be made upon order of the board and warrants therefor must be signed by the chairman and one other member of the board. All warrants drawn by the board in payment of items of expense of a drain are payable from the proper drain fund and must be accepted by the treasurer in payment of taxes levied in regard to the drain. All warrants, after presentation to the county treasurer or, if the water resource district treasurer is custodian of the drain funds, the water resource district treasurer for payment, if not paid for want of funds, must be registered by the county treasurer or water resource district treasurer and thereafter bear interest at a rate not to exceed eight percent per annum. The county commissioners, by proper resolution, are authorized to purchase drainage warrants from general county funds in instances when the warrants will be funded by a bond issue within six months from the date of purchase.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 29; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2129; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 35; 2001, ch. 567, § 3.

61-21-30.
Additional assessment to meet deficit or additional expense.

In case the amount realized from the assessment made for the acquisition of right of way or for the construction, improvement, repair, and maintenance of any drain is not sufficient to pay all necessary expenses in regard thereto, or to pay and retire any bonds issued in connection with such operations, a further assessment shall be made to meet such deficit and such additional amount shall be levied and collected in the manner provided in sections 61-21-27, 61-21-28, and 61-21-52.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 30; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2130.

61-21-31.
Drains along and across public roads and railroads.

Drains may be laid along, within the limits of, or across any public road or highway, but not to the injury of such road. Where it is necessary to run a drain across such highway, the department of transportation, board of county commissioners, or the board of township supervisors, as the case may be, when notified by the board to do so, shall make necessary openings through such road or highway and shall build and keep in repair all suitable culverts or bridges at its own expense, as provided under the applicable provisions of section 61-21-32. Where drains are laid along or within the limits of roads or highways, such drains shall be maintained and kept open by the board at the expense of the drainage district concerned. A drain may be laid along any railroad when necessary, but not to the injury of such road, and when it shall be necessary to run a drain across a railroad, the railroad company, when notified by the board to do so, shall make the necessary opening through said road and shall build suitable bridges and culverts and keep them in repair.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 31; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2131.

Cross-References.

Drains along and across public roads and railroads, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-42.

61-21-32.
Construction of bridges and culverts — Cost.

The board shall construct such bridges or culverts over or in connection with a drain as in its judgment may be necessary to furnish passage from one part to another of any private farm or tract of land intersected by such drain. The cost of the construction thereof shall be charged as part of the cost of constructing such drain, and such bridge or passageway shall be maintained under the authority of the board, and the necessary expense thereof shall be deemed a part of the cost of keeping such drain open and in repair. Whenever any bridge or culvert is to be constructed on a county or township highway system over and across or in connection with a drain, and the cost thereof shall exceed five hundred dollars, the cost of constructing such bridge or culvert shall be shared in the following manner: The state water commission may, if funds are available therefor, participate in the portion of the cost thereof that exceeds five hundred dollars in accordance with such rules and regulations as it may prescribe. The remaining cost thereof shall be borne on the basis of forty percent by the county and sixty percent by the water resource district or the drainage district which has created the need for such construction. If, however, moneys have not been made available to the commission for such participation, then and in that case, forty percent of the cost of a bridge or culvert costing in excess of one hundred dollars shall be paid by the county and sixty percent shall be charged as cost of the drain to the drainage district. Whenever any bridge or culvert costing one hundred dollars or less is needed on any such road, the cost of such bridge or culvert shall be charged on the basis of sixty percent to the water resource district or the drainage district and forty percent shall be borne by the township in which such bridge or culvert is located.

In the case of such bridge or culvert construction when there is federal financial participation, if there are costs exceeding the amount of such federal participation then the excess balance shall be borne by the water resource district, drainage district, county, or township, according to the foregoing provisions of this section, as the case may be.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 32; 1957, ch. 387, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2132.

Cross-References.

Construction of bridges and culverts, cost, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-43.

61-21-32.1.
Culvert and pipe arch bids and acceptance.

A board may advertise for bids to supply culverts and pipe arches and may accept one or more low bids. A board may utilize bids for such materials received by the county within which the board has jurisdiction and may accept one or more low bids. The board may then purchase materials from the accepted low bidder or bidders for a period of one year from the date of the original acceptance of the bids.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 571, § 2.

Cross-References.

Bids to supply culverts and pipe arches, advertising, acceptance, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.1-44.

61-21-33.
Boards of two or more counties may construct drains through counties.

Whenever it shall be deemed necessary by the boards of two or more counties in this state to construct or extend a drain through or into two or more counties in this state, the several boards in the counties into or through which such proposed drain may extend when completed may establish, construct, and maintain such drain through or into two or more counties in the manner provided in section 61-21-34.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 33; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2133.

61-21-34.
Procedure to construct or extend a drain through or into two or more counties.

In order to construct or extend a drain through or into two or more counties in this state, a petition must be presented to the several boards for the establishment of the drain in their several counties as provided in this chapter. The boards of the counties shall hold a joint meeting and shall determine the necessity or expediency of the establishment of the drain. The several boards of all counties through or into which the proposed drain may run shall agree upon the proportion of damages and benefits to accrue to the lands affected in each county, and for this purpose the boards shall consider the entire course of the drain through all the counties as one drain. Should the boards fail to agree upon the benefits to accrue to the lands in each county, the boards shall submit the points in controversy to the department of water resources, and the department’s decision is final. The boards may apportion the cost of establishing and constructing the entire drain ratably and equitably upon the lands in each county in proportion to the benefits to accrue to the county’s lands. When the boards have apportioned the costs, the boards shall make written reports of the apportionment to the auditors of the several counties affected. The reports must show the portion of cost of the entire drain to be paid by taxes upon the lands in each of the counties and must be signed by the boards of all counties affected. Upon the filing of the reports, the several boards shall meet and assess against the lands in each of the counties, ratably and equitably as provided by this chapter, an amount sufficient to pay the proportion of the cost of the drain in each county. The provisions of this chapter relating to drains within a single county govern the establishment, construction, maintenance, repair, and cleanout of the drains.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 34; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2134; 2021, ch. 488, § 168, effective August 1, 2021.

61-21-35.
Settlement of unpaid warrants.

In the event that drain warrants which have been issued pursuant to the establishment of a drain in two or more counties remain unpaid and the amounts realized from the original assessments made are not sufficient to pay said warrants and an additional assessment would be necessary to meet such deficit, the board of county commissioners of any county affected, if such board finds that such county has received benefits from such drain by reasons of public health, convenience, or welfare, as provided by law, and might therefore be liable for assessment or reassessment and that the credit of the county is or might be affected by the existence of such outstanding and unpaid warrants, may negotiate and execute a settlement with the owners of such warrants and pay the amount of such settlement from the general fund of the county.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 386, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2135.

61-21-36.
Cooperating with drainage boards or officials of other states in drainage matters.

Any board established under the laws of this state, either severally or jointly with other boards, may cooperate with any similar drainage districts or drainage boards in any adjoining state in the establishment of any drainage area or drainage basin for the control of boundary waters between such states.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 347, § 35; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 61-2136.